phon-vepenth.xfst
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! Deletion of vowels in some stems 'burun' -> 'burn-u' 
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------

define vowel  @"vowel.a"|⟪I⟫|⟪A⟫;
define consonant  @"consonant.a";

regex  [a|ı|â] -> ⟪sBUV⟫,
       [e|i|î] -> ⟪sFUV⟫,
       [u|o|û] -> ⟪sBRV⟫,
       [ö|ü]   -> ⟪sFRV⟫
        || ⟪del⟫ _ consonant+ [\consonant]* vowel
    ,, ⟪del⟫ -> 0
;
